Hawaii statutes.
§664-10 Powers of commissioner; procedure.
Each commissioner of boundaries shall have power to administer oaths, to punish
contempts, to grant adjournments, to subpoena and compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of books and papers, to issue execution for costs,
and generally to exercise the same authority in regard to the commissioner's
special jurisdiction as is by law conferred upon circuit courts. The Hawaii
rules of civil procedure shall apply to proceedings under this part, except insofar
as and to the extent that the rules are inconsistent with the provisions of
this part. [L 1894-5, c 14, §6; RL 1925, §561; am L 1932 2d, c 8, §2; RL 1935,
§3669; RL 1945, §10210; RL 1955, §234-10; HRS §664-10; am L 1972, c 90, §6(d);
gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

In the first sentence, the comma after "attendance of
witnesses" deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next